West Virginia, session 2025, HB2443.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. sex offender registration act. §15-12-11. Prohibition of sex offenders from residing near schools and similarly situated facilities; exceptions. (a) Enactment. – Convicted sex offenders who are required to register in West Virginia are prohibited from residing within 3000 feet of the real property comprising a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school, a childcare facility, a residential child-caring agency, a children’s group care home or any playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of 18 years.(b) Exceptions. – (1) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the offender is serving a sentence at a jail, prison, juvenile facility or other correctional institution or facility that is located within 3000 feet of a school or facility;(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the offender is subject to an order of commitment under Title 41 MCA that places the offender in a facility or institution located within 3000 feet of a school or facility; and(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the offender is a minor or ward under a guardianship.